Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.120

Licensee to make daily determination of air components—Record, form, contents.

The licensee shall make air component determinations as to the percentage of carbon dioxide, oxygen and temperature at least once each day. A record of such determinations shall be kept on a form prescribed by the director for a period of two years and shall include the following:

(1) The name and address of the licensee.

(2) The number of the warehouse and the storage capacity of the warehouse.

(3) The date of sealing of the warehouse.

(4) Date of opening of the warehouse.

(5) A daily record of the date and time of the tests, including the percentage of carbon dioxide, percentage of oxygen and the temperature.

[ 1961 c 29 s 12.]